Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.185

Annexation of federal areas by first-class city.

Any unincorporated area contiguous to a first-class city may be annexed thereto by an ordinance accepting a gift, grant, lease or cession of jurisdiction from the government of the United States of the right to occupy or control it.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.13.185. Prior: 1957 c 239 s 7.]